Massachusetts, session 194th, H4652.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 46. The board of higher education shall have, within its discretion, the authority
to request that any institution of higher education provide financial literacy counseling to
accepted applicants of the institution relative to student loans and other expenses to students
upon arriving on campus. The board is further authorized to provide a College Financing Plan
developed by the Federal Consumer Financial Protection Bureau and the United States
Department of Education to said accepted applicants of any institution of higher education. The
College Financing Plan shall include the estimated cost of attendance including; tuition and fees,
housing and meals, books and supplies, transportation, other education costs as well as grants
and scholarships, work-study, and loan options. The institution of higher education may provide
an electronic version of the College Financing Plan in a printable format. The board of higher
education may promulgate regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.
of 1